Hawaii statutes.
[§431:14A-111] Reserves, investment.
The board may invest or reinvest any surplus or reserves within the limitations
established for insurance companies under chapter 431. [L 1996, c 261, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next